Utah statutes.
13-35-303.   Effect of terminating a franchise.
If under Section 13-35-301 the executive director permits a franchisor to
terminate or not continue a franchise and prohibits the franchisor from
entering into a franchise for the sale of new powersport vehicles of a line-
make in a relevant market area, the franchisor may not enter into a franchise
for the sale of new powersport vehicles of that line-make in the specified
relevant market area unless the executive director determines, after a
recommendation by the advisory board, that there has been a change of
circumstances so that the relevant market area at the time of the
establishment of the new franchise agreement can reasonably be expected to
support the new franchisee.
